Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.040

Examination standards for state trust companies—Rule making—Special conditions.

(1) The director is authorized to adopt rules governing the examination standards for a state trust company, trust department, third-party service provider, and other persons subject to investigation and examination under this title, including the application by rule of examination standards of other federal and state financial institutions regulators and standards adopted from cooperative agreements made by the director under RCW 30B.38.060.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, such rules shall not be inconsistent with the uniform interagency trust rating system, or its equivalent, of the federal financial institutions examination council or its successor agency; and subject to subsection (3) of this section, the director shall apply the standards of the uniform interagency trust rating system, or its equivalent, in its examination and rating of state trust companies and other persons subject to investigation and examination under this title to the extent that the department has not adopted applicable rules.

(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the director may, in lieu of or in addition to applicable rules, prescribe special conditions for a new state trust company or an out-of-state trust company doing business in Washington state, to the extent that such special conditions contain standards of examination and rating for the state trust company or out-of-state trust company that the director deems necessary to address circumstances including, without limitation, an emerging business model, which do not appear to the director to be contemplated or adequately addressed by the uniform interagency trust rating system, or its equivalent, of the federal financial institutions examination council or its successor agency.

[ 2019 c 389 s 16; 2014 c 37 s 337.]